Washington statutes.
RCW 15.49.940

Short title.

RCW 15.49.020 through * 15.49.950 shall be known as the "Washington State Seed Act."

[ 1969 c 63 s 53.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 15.49.950 was decodified pursuant to 2017 3rd sp.s. c 25 s 4.